Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1277.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part III of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 16PLANT AND POLLINATOR PROTECTIONSubchapterA. General ProvisionsB. Licensure and CertificationC. EnforcementD. Miscellaneous Provisions12345678910111213141516171819 SUBCHAPTER AGENERAL PROVISIONSSec.1601. Short title.1602. Definitions.1603. Right of entry.1604. Inspections, sampling, testing and certifications.1605. Regulations, orders and pest tolerances.1606. Surveys to determine existence of plant and pollinator pests.1607. Proceedings upon finding plant or pollinator pests.1608. Invasive species or plant contaminants being moved by plant merchants or pollinator operations.1609. Stop orders.1610. Quarantines.§ 1601. Short title.This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Plant and Pollinator Protection Act.§ 1602. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Apiary." A place where one or more colonies or nucleus colonies of honey bees are kept."Beekeeper." A person that manages honey bees."Beekeeper location." The primary address for a beekeeper who manages honey bees primarily for personal use but does not engage in other commercial pollinator transactions."Business location." Premises where distribution of plants for planting or managed pollinators takes place. This also 20250HB1277PN1431 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 includes the primary address of a commercial beekeeper."Colony." A distinguishable, localized population of bees in any life stage and associated comb, honey and pollen."Commodity." An item for sale."Compliance agreement." A written agreement between the department and a person engaged in distributing regulated articles wherein the person engaged in distributing regulated articles agrees to comply with specified provisions and follow specified business practices to prevent dissemination of pests."Control." The reduction of the population of a plant or pollinator pest to an acceptable level as determined by the department."Department." The Department of Agriculture of the Commonwealth."Distribute" or "distribution." To make offers or solicitations for the sale, resale, barter, exchange, loan, lease, distribution or transfer of managed pollinators or plants for planting."Eradication." The elimination or removal of a pest from a defined geographic area."General quarantine order." An order of the department pertaining to an area or locality within this Commonwealth to restrict the movement of or prevent the spread, sale, distribution or other disposition of a plant, plant product, pollinator, pollinator product, pest, premises or any other regulated article from movement into, within or from the area or locality subject to the quarantine. A general quarantine order may encompass the entire Commonwealth."Hive." A structure, including natural or artificial boxes, containers or receptacles, or any part thereof, including 20250HB1277PN1431 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 frames, which may be utilized by a beekeeper as a domicile for bees where the bees are expected to inhabit and establish a colony."Honey bee." Any life stage of the common honey bee ( Apis mellifera ) . "Inspector." An employee or officer of the department or a representative or agent of the department duly appointed by the secretary to carry out the provisions of this chapter."Interstate quarantine order" or "international quarantine order." An order of the department establishing restrictions upon the use, sale, distribution, movement or other disposition of a plant, plant product, pollinator, pollinator product, pest, premises or any other regulated article contaminated with, exposed to, harboring or capable of harboring or spreading a pest, and regulating or forbidding their entry into this Commonwealth from another state, territory of the United States or a foreign country."Invasive species." A nonnative species whose introduction causes or is likely to cause economic or environmental harm or harm to animal or human health, as determined by the department."License." Written authorization issued by the department and required for every plant merchant, pollinator operation or person to operate a business or manage premises on which the distribution of plants for planting or managed pollinators or the maintenance of honey bees takes place."Licensed establishment." An establishment licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter."Licensed person." A person licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter."Managed pollinator." Honey bees being kept for any purpose, 20250HB1277PN1431 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and any other pollinators, such as bumble bees (genus Bombus ), mason bees (genus Osmia ) or leafcutter bees (genus Megachile ) being distributed for purposes of pollination services."Nucleus colony." A small colony of honey bees that usually includes a queen, brood and food resources on a comb, and is categorized by size, such as six-frame, five-frame, baby frame, deep frame or medium frame, or queen status, such as queenright or queenless."Out yard." Fixed premises in this Commonwealth where an apiary is maintained on a continuing basis from which hives may be moved to temporary locations for crop pollination and returned."Package bees." A container, usually sold by weight, in which worker honey bees, with or without a queen, are contained temporarily without forming a colony."Person." An individual, corporation, association, partnership or any other entity, including a Federal, State and local governmental entity."Pest." An organism causing or capable of causing injury or damage to plants or plant products, and pollinators or pollinator products, as determined by the department. The term includes disease-causing pathogens, parasites, other plants and insects and invasive species capable of causing injury to plants or pollinators."Phytosanitary." Having the purpose of preventing or mitigating the introduction or spread of plant pests or limiting the economic impact of plant pests."Phytosanitary certificate." A document authorized or prepared by the department that affirms, declares or verifies that an article, nursery stock, plant product or any other 20250HB1277PN1431 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 article regulated under this chapter meets plant health standards and requirements of an intended receiving municipality, state or country."Plant" or "plant product." A plant or portion of a plant, whether living or dead."Plant contaminant." A biological, chemical or radiological substance which in sufficient concentration in plants can adversely affect other living organisms."Plant merchant." Any of the following:(1) A person that owns, leases, manages or is in charge of a business location, premises or nursery and grows, warehouses, displays, stores or in any manner keeps, maintains or deals with plants for planting for distribution.(2) A person that buys or obtains on consignment plants for planting for the purpose of distributing.(3) A person that is a commercial distributor of plants for planting.(4) A person, such as a landscaper, that is engaged in the distribution of plants for the purpose of planting or transplanting for others or grows, maintains, warehouses or deals with plants for planting distribution to others.(5) A person that distributes plants for planting to others as a premium, promotion or advertisement or for research purposes.(6) A person that advertises plants for planting for distribution.(7) A person that brokers or solicits orders for the distribution of plants for planting.(8) A person that collects native plants or parts of plants to be sold or grown for plants for planting.20250HB1277PN1431 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Plants for planting." Living plants and parts of living plants intended to remain planted, to be planted or to be replanted to ensure their subsequent growth, reproduction or propagation. The term pertains to living plants and includes all trees, shrubs, brambles, woody vines, woody florist stock, herbaceous perennials, vegetable plants, bulbs, bedding and other annual herbaceous plants, their roots, cuttings, grafts, scions, buds, fruit pits, seeds and their parts for propagation, except field crop seeds, vegetable seeds and flower seeds, regardless of where these plants or plant materials may have been grown or are growing."Pollinator." An insect that moves pollen from plants to fertilize other plants for the purpose of plant reproduction."Pollinator certificate of inspection." A document authorized or prepared by the department or by a recognized official of the country, state or territory of origin that affirms, attests or verifies that items such as colonies, hives, nucleus colonies, queens, package bees, managed pollinators or other regulated articles offered for distribution meet health requirements established by the authorized signatory agency."Pollinator operation." Any of the following:(1) A beekeeper, whether managing honey bees for commercial business or personal use.(2) A person that offers live honey bees or other managed pollinators for sale or distribution.(3) A person that buys or obtains on consignment managed pollinators for the purpose of distribution.(4) A person that commercially distributes managed pollinators.(5) A person that distributes managed pollinators to 20250HB1277PN1431 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 others as a premium, promotion or advertisement or for research purposes.(6) A person that advertises managed pollinators for distribution.(7) A person that brokers or solicits orders for the distribution of managed pollinators.(8) A person, such as a business, school, club or association, that manages honey bees for educational or therapeutic purposes, the organization's use, research or any similar purpose."Premises."(1) Any of the following:(i) A definite portion of real estate.(ii) Land with its appurtenances, including any structure erected thereon.(iii) A vehicle or vessel used in transporting passengers, goods, plants, pollinators or their products by land, air or water.(2) As used in this chapter, the term shall be liberally construed."Quarantine order." An order of the department establishing restrictions upon the use, sale, distribution, movement or other disposition of a plant, plant product, pollinator, pollinator product, pest, premises or any other regulated article contaminated with, exposed to, harboring or capable of harboring or spreading a pest, that is required to eradicate, contain, control or prevent contamination by or exposure to a pest."Queen." The dominant reproductive female insect recognized within the colony."Regulated article." A plant, plant product, pollinator, 20250HB1277PN1431 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pollinator product, hive, storage place, packaging, premises, facility, vehicle, building, tools and equipment, conveyance, container, soil and any other organism, object, goods, product or material capable of harboring or spreading pests or potentially exposed to pests that are subject to regulatory measures."Remote location." Any of the following:(1) A premise that is owned, leased, managed or used by a plant merchant, pollinator operation or other person and where plants for planting or managed pollinators are kept, maintained, managed, displayed, warehoused, stored or grown for the purpose of distribution at or through a physically separate business location.(2) An out yard and other location where managed pollinators are kept, other than the beekeeper location or business location."Secretary." The Secretary of Agriculture of the Commonwealth."Special quarantine order." An order of the department covering a single premises, person or business location that establishes restrictions upon the use, sale, distribution, movement or other disposition of a plant, plant product, pollinator, pollinator product, pest or any other regulated article contaminated with, exposed to, harboring or capable of harboring or spreading a pest."Stop order." A written notice issued by the department to the owner or custodian of a plant, plant product, managed pollinators or other regulated article that prohibits the sale or movement of plants, plant products, managed pollinators or other regulated articles, including an article or object subject 20250HB1277PN1431 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to a quarantine order issued by the department."Systems approach." The application of different pest risk management measures, at least two of which act independently but with cumulative effect, to apply the appropriate level of phytosanitary protection. The term includes measures which do not kill pests or reduce their prevalence, but reduce their potential for entry or establishment, such as safeguarding."Treatment order." A written order of the department specifying certain measures to be taken to control or eradicate a pest, including destruction of plants, plant products, pollinators, hives or other regulated articles harboring or capable of harboring or spreading a pest.§ 1603. Right of entry.(a) Right of entry to licensed person.--(1) With regard to licensed persons or persons required to be licensed under this chapter, in the performance of the duties required by this chapter, the department or an inspector for the department shall have the authority to, within reasonable hours, enter a premises, business location, remote location, out yard, building or vehicle for the purpose of investigating and sampling regulated articles and enforcement of this chapter.(2) The department or an inspector for the department may open, inspect and sample a bundle, package or other container of regulated articles to test for pests and to carry out control measures as established in this chapter.(3) The department or an inspector for the department shall be provided, upon request, access to records for the purpose of review, inspection or copying of the records required to be kept under this chapter.20250HB1277PN1431 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A person may not:(i) deny access to the department or an inspector for the department;(ii) hinder, thwart, cause undue delay or defeat inspection or other necessary activity by misrepresentation or concealment of facts or conditions; or(iii) interfere with the department or an inspector for the department as specified in section 1621 (relating to interference with inspector).(b) Right of entry to private property.--(1) The department or an inspector for the department shall have the authority to enter onto the premises of a person not subject to the licensure requirements of this chapter for the purpose of investigation and enforcement of this chapter, including the collection of samples for testing of pests and to carry out control measures as established in this chapter.(2) Once on the premises, the department or an inspector for the department must present themselves to the owner or keeper of the property and obtain the permission of the owner or a search warrant to enter or search an enclosed or fenced area of the premises and any building, vehicle, vessel, article, machine or conveyance located on the premises. The department or an inspector for the department shall be provided access to records for the purpose of review, inspection and copying of the records when requested and as required for proper enforcement of this chapter.(c) Refusal of entry.--(1) A person required to be licensed under this chapter 20250HB1277PN1431 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may not refuse entry to the department or an inspector for the department acting under the authority of this chapter. Refusing entry shall include:(i) Preventing the department or an inspector for the department from entering the premises, a building or other area of the licensed establishment where regulated articles or records are kept or present or where there exists reasonable suspicion that regulated articles or records are kept or present.(ii) Preventing the department or an inspector for the department from inspecting a regulated article under this chapter, including access to and inspection of required records.(iii) Hiding or concealing a regulated article, including records, from the department or an inspector for the department.(iv) Hiding, concealing or failure to disclose a business location, including a remote location or an out yard.(v) An act or omission that prevents the department or an inspector for the department from gaining entry or access to the premises, buildings, regulated articles or areas of the licensed establishment where regulated articles are kept or present.(vi) Any other act that hinders, interferes with or causes unreasonable delay to the enforcement of this chapter.(2) The following apply:(i) If the department or an inspector for the department attempts an inspection under this chapter and 20250HB1277PN1431 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 no person is present to grant access to the establishment or place to be inspected, the department or an inspector for the department may post a notice of inspection on an entrance to the establishment, indicating the need for access to the establishment for purpose of inspection within 36 hours from the time of posting.(ii) Failure to permit an inspection within the 36-hour time period on the notice under subparagraph (i) shall constitute a refusal of entry under this subsection, unless, within the 36-hour time period, the owner of the establishment to be inspected contacts the department or an inspector for the department that posted the notice of inspection and both parties agree upon a different date or time. Entering into an agreement under this subparagraph shall be at the sole discretion of the department.(d) Search warrants.--An inspector or employee of the department may apply for a search warrant to a court of competent jurisdiction authorized to issue a search warrant for the purposes of inspecting, examining, sampling and surveying the premises, plants, managed pollinators and other regulated articles and records of licensed persons or persons required to be licensed under this chapter. A warrant may be issued for a person not subject to the licensure requirements of this chapter if there is reasonable suspicion that a pest exists on the premises. The warrant shall be issued upon probable cause. The following apply:(1) If a person is subject to the licensure requirements of this chapter, probable cause shall exist upon a showing by the department of any of the following:20250HB1277PN1431 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) That access or entry for the purpose of inspection or examination has been refused as specified in subsection (c).(ii) The department has reasonable suspicion to believe that a violation of this chapter or a provision, rule, regulation or order adopted under this chapter has occurred or is occurring.(iii) The department has reasonable suspicion to believe that the premises or a regulated article that is or has been kept on the premises carries or is at risk of carrying pests or has been exposed to pests.(2) A search warrant shall be issued upon the showing of probable cause that a violation of this chapter or a provision, rule, regulation or order adopted under this chapter, has occurred or is occurring on the premises, or upon reasonable suspicion that a pest exists on the premises or that a regulated article that is or has been kept on the premises carries or is at risk of carrying pests or has been exposed to pests.(3) The search warrant shall describe the premises, including the address and name of the company or owner, if known, which may be searched under authority of the search warrant, but need not describe the plant, plant products, managed pollinators or other regulated articles which may be searched or detained and are alleged to harbor, be capable of harboring, carry or be at risk of carrying pests or have been exposed to pests. A person may not refuse or delay admission to a premises to the department or an inspector for the department provided with a search warrant issued under this section.20250HB1277PN1431 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1604. Inspections, sampling, testing and certifications.(a) General inspection and sampling authority.--The department shall have the authority to:(1) Inspect the premises of a person required to be licensed under this chapter, including an area in which plants, plant products, pollinators, pollinator products or other regulated articles are grown, stored, kept or distributed to others.(2) Inspect, at any time or place, a plant, plant product, managed pollinator, hive or other regulated article stored, kept, shipped or moved to or from this Commonwealth, and the vehicles or vessels on which they are shipped or contained.(3) Collect samples for the presence of and testing for pests and carry out control measures as established in this chapter.(b) Private property.--The department shall have the authority to enter onto the land or premises of a person not subject to the licensure requirements of this chapter for the purpose of investigation and enforcement of this chapter, including the collection of samples for testing of pests. The department shall obtain either the permission of the owner or a search warrant to enter or search an enclosed or fenced area of the property, building, vehicle, vessel, article, machine or conveyance located on the land or premises.(c) Risk-based inspections.--The department shall, to the extent practicable, employ a risk-based approach to conducting the inspections authorized under subsection (a), giving comparatively greater attention to pests deemed to be of greatest risk to this Commonwealth and plants for planting, 20250HB1277PN1431 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 plants, plant products, managed pollinators, hives or other regulated articles or premises that present the greatest risk of harboring pests or creating other pest-related problems.(d) Discretionary inspections.--(1) The department may provide phytosanitary certificate inspection services for a person that owns or possesses plants, plant products or other regulated articles intended for shipment either interstate or internationally as necessary to meet the statutory or regulatory requirements of the intended receiving state or country. A phytosanitary certificate inspection may include:(i) Certification in accordance with another state's or country's special handling requirements.(ii) Confirmation of origin requirements, preshipment treatment requirements, testing requirements or inspection requirements.(2) The department may provide inspection services necessary for the issuance of a phytosanitary certificate inspection for a person that owns or possesses pollinators or other regulated articles intended for sale or shipment either interstate or internationally as necessary to meet the statutory or regulatory requirements of an intended receiving state or country. An inspection may include:(i) Certification in accordance with another state's or country's special handling requirements.(ii) Confirmation of origin requirements, preshipment treatment requirements, testing requirements or inspection requirements.(3) The department may provide services necessary for issuing compliance agreements to a person that seeks to meet 20250HB1277PN1431 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements or regulations of other states for shipping plants, plant products, managed pollinators or other regulated articles. Multiple states and commodities may be included in one comprehensive compliance agreement.(4) The department shall charge a fee for performing any of the specialized certificate inspections described in this subsection. The fee shall be established as provided in section 1629 (relating to fees).(5) The certificate inspections described in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) are discretionary on the part of the department and shall only be made if all of the following occur:(i) A request is made for the certificate inspection.(ii) The fee for the certificate inspection has been remitted to the department.(iii) The department has qualified staff available to conduct the requested specialized certificate inspection.(iv) The person making the request is in compliance with this chapter, the regulations of the department and an order of the department issued under this chapter.(v) The person making the request is not found to be in violation of this chapter.(vi) The person making the request is current on all fees due under this chapter.(e) Additional inspections, certifications and testing.--The department shall have the discretion to provide additional inspection, certification or testing services for a person that owns or possesses plants, managed pollinators or other regulated 20250HB1277PN1431 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 articles and may establish and charge reasonable fees for the services. The fees shall be established as provided in section 1629. Services may include inspections conducted to confirm control, eradication or apparent freedom from pests or to provide certification other than as described in subsection (d).(f) Refusal to inspect.--The department may refuse to perform an inspection described in this section if:(1) the plants, managed pollinators or regulated articles to be inspected are found to be in a condition where they cannot be adequately inspected;(2) the premises on which the plants, managed pollinators or regulated articles are located is posted with restrictions, including biosecurity restrictions, which the department finds to be burdensome or unreasonable; or(3) the environs in which the plants, managed pollinators or regulated articles are located present a danger to the health or safety of the department employee or inspection for the department.(g) Delegation.--The department may delegate, through agreement, inspection, testing, training or certification duties under this chapter to an agent acting on behalf of the department.§ 1605. Regulations, orders and pest tolerances.(a) Regulations and orders.--(1) The department shall have the power to promulgate and adopt orders, rules and regulations as necessary to effectuate the intent and purpose of this chapter.(2) Except to the extent that they are inconsistent with a provision of this chapter, regulations promulgated under former Chapter 21 (relating to bees) or the former act of 20250HB1277PN1431 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 December 16, 1992 (P.L.1228, No.162), known as the Plant Pest Act, shall remain in effect unless subsequently modified by regulations promulgated by the department.(b) Pest tolerances.--(1) The department may establish tolerances for pests. Pest tolerances may prescribe acceptable maximum concentrations or amounts of pests that may be present on premises, plants, plant products, pollinators, pollinator products or other regulated articles.(2) Methods for promulgating the pest tolerances may include a quarantine order or an order transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(3) The pest tolerances shall be reviewed at least annually by the Plant and Pollinator Protection Committee established in section 1628 (relating to establishment of advisory boards and committees). The Plant and Pollinator Protection Committee shall make recommendations to the department for changes to pest tolerances.(4) The department shall provide justification for a decision on pest tolerance that does not match the recommendations of the Plant and Pollinator Protection Committee.§ 1606. Surveys to determine existence of plant and pollinator pests.The department shall have the authority to engage in the following actions:(1) Conduct investigations and surveys to determine the existence of pests and the distribution and severity of the damage caused by pests.20250HB1277PN1431 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Collect and transport samples of pests, plants, pollinators or regulated articles which are capable of harboring pests.(3) Conduct studies relating to the control of pests.(4) Conduct other investigations necessary to protect this Commonwealth's plants, pollinators and related industries from pests.(5) Prescribe and require treatment and control measures, including stop orders and quarantine orders, as provided for in this chapter.(6) Report and publish the results of investigations, surveys, studies or required treatment and control measures carried out under this chapter.§ 1607. Proceedings upon finding plant or pollinator pests.(a) Notification.--If the department finds pests present or has reasonable suspicion that pests exist on a premises or regulated article, or if pests are present and exceed an applicable pest tolerance established under section 1605(b) (relating to regulations, orders and pest tolerances), the department must provide the owner, lessee, keeper or manager with written notice of the pest presence. The following apply:(1) The notice shall be left with the owner of the premises or an individual 18 years of age or older residing on the premises.(2) For a licensed establishment, the notice may be included in an inspection report issued in accordance with this chapter.(3) The department may take any other action authorized under this chapter.(b) General authority.--20250HB1277PN1431 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Where an inspection, survey or test permitted under section 1604 (relating to inspections, sampling, testing and certifications), reveals the presence of a pest or the presence of a pest that exceeds pest tolerance established under section 1605(b), the department may take an action authorized under this chapter, including:(i) Issuance of a treatment order, stop order and detention.(ii) Establishment of a quarantine order.(iii) Assessment of penalties and implementation of enforcement actions as permitted under this chapter.(2) If the department has reasonable suspicion of the existence of or observes signs or symptoms of the presence of a pest, or the presence of a pest that exceeds an applicable pest tolerance established under section 1605(b) on any premises or regulated article, the department may conduct inspections, sampling, testing and certification as authorized under section 1604. The department may take an action authorized under this chapter, including issuance of a treatment order, stop order and detention or establishment of a quarantine order.(3) Honey bees or other pollinators found on premises other than beekeeper locations, business locations and remote locations licensed under this chapter found to be infected or infested with pests shall be subject to immediate destruction without notice.(c) Marking of infested or infected articles.--Upon finding a pest, the department shall promptly identify and, where practicable, mark all premises and regulated articles that are confirmed to be infected or infested, or for which there is a 20250HB1277PN1431 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reasonable suspicion of infection or infestation. Removal of markings placed by the department under this subsection without written instructions to do so by the department shall be a violation of this chapter.(d) Treatment measures.--(1) If the secretary determines that a serious pest situation exists in any part of this Commonwealth, a quarantine order, as authorized under section 1610 (relating to quarantines), must be established and necessary eradication or control measures may be taken by the department.(2) Prior to carrying out a treatment procedure, the department shall provide written notice to the property owner. The written notice may be in the form of a copy of a general treatment order or procedure specified in a quarantine order.(3) The department or an inspector for the department is authorized to enter the premises during reasonable hours to carry out the eradication or control measures under section 1603 (relating to right of entry).(e) Treatment orders.--Upon finding a pest, the department shall issue a treatment order to a responsible person, such as the owner, manager or licensee. The treatment order shall be in writing and shall describe the following:(1) The pest situation that exists.(2) Details regarding the required eradication control or eradication measures.(3) The date by which eradication and control measures must be completed, including a time frame within which the department will confirm treatment is complete and approved.20250HB1277PN1431 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Other orders.--The department shall have the discretion to issue a stop order under section 1609 (relating to stop orders) or a quarantine order under section 1610, or both, imposing appropriate restrictions until the control or eradication measures required under the treatment order have been completed and approved by the department. The department shall issue a treatment order, stop order, quarantine order or any combination if the department finds pests present or has reasonable suspicion that pests exist on a premises or regulated article, including any abandoned crops, noncultivated plants, abandoned hives or feral pollinator populations which harbor or may harbor, carry or may carry, or constitute or may constitute a reservoir for the pest.(g) Failure to comply with treatment order.--The responsible person issued the eradication order is required to follow the treatment order. If a person that is issued a treatment order fails to comply with the treatment order, the department shall carry out the eradication and control measures. All expenses associated with the eradication and control measures shall be paid to the department by the person. The department may impose additional penalties for a violation under this chapter.§ 1608. Invasive species or plant contaminants being moved by plant merchants or pollinator operations.If there is reasonable suspicion that the activity of a plant merchant or pollinator operation is a mechanism for the spread of invasive species or plant contaminants, the department may issue a stop order, treatment order or quarantine order or pursue any other measure provided for in this chapter to stop the spread of the invasive species or plant contaminant. The department may coordinate with any other regulatory agency that 20250HB1277PN1431 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 has jurisdiction over the invasive species or plant contaminant.§ 1609. Stop orders.(a) Authority to issue.--(1) (i) If there is reasonable suspicion of the presence of a pest, or an inspection or test reveals the presence of a pest, or pests are present and exceed an applicable pest tolerance established under section 1605(b) (relating to regulations, orders and pest tolerances), the department may issue and enforce a written stop order.(ii) The stop order may be issued to any or all of the owners, lessees, managers, employees or custodians of the premises.(iii) A stop order may be placed on all or any part of a business or premises, and may include any plant, pollinator or other regulated article.(iv) The stop order shall establish standards for release of the stop order, including:(A) compliance with a quarantine or treatment order issued by the department;(B) inspection that verifies there is no reasonable suspicion or actual presence of a pest that was the subject of the stop order; or(C) presence of a pest above a pest tolerance established under section 1605(b).(2) A stop order may be issued in conjunction with a quarantine or treatment order or for a violation of this chapter or a provision, rule, regulation or order adopted under this chapter.(3) A stop order shall have the effect of requiring the 20250HB1277PN1431 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person designated in the stop order to hold any item or items described in the order at a designated place and to refrain from distributing or offering for distribution or moving in any manner those items. The owner, lessee, manager or custodian of the premises under the stop order must notify the department when the standards for release of the stop order have been met in order for the department to verify and repeal the stop order.(4) If it is determined that multiple registered locations received anything that is the subject of or covered under a stop order in one location, that order may be extended to all locations without a physical visit by an inspector until the material is cleared or released. The department shall coordinate notification to all locations.(5) A stop order shall remain in effect until repealed in writing by the department.(b) Posting of stop order.--A plant or other material that is the subject of or covered under the stop order shall be clearly identified and, where practicable, conspicuously marked by the department. The stop order may be required to be posted in a conspicuous place or places on the business location or premises subject to the stop order as determined by the inspector. Removal of markings placed by the department without written instructions to do so by the department shall be a violation of this chapter.(c) Violation of stop order.--Failure to follow a stop order shall be a violation of this chapter. The department may impose penalties authorized under this chapter for a violation of a stop order.§ 1610. Quarantines.20250HB1277PN1431 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Authority of department.--(1) The department may establish quarantines as specified in this chapter or under regulations to prevent, delay or slow the introduction, dissemination or spread of a plant or pollinator pest within this Commonwealth or into this Commonwealth from any country, state or territory.(2) The department shall transmit notice of a general quarantine order, interstate quarantine order or international quarantine order to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(3) Special quarantine orders shall be established through posting of the order as specified in subsection (g).(4) As part of a quarantine, the department may issue conditions, restrictions, control measures or any combination that the department considers necessary to eradicate, control, prevent or reduce the movement of the pest.(5) Under a quarantine, the department may prohibit or restrict, without inspection, the use, movement, shipment, transportation, distribution or offer of distribution or other disposition of a plant, pollinator, premises or other regulated article.(b) Power to establish and enforce.--If a pest exists anywhere within or outside of this Commonwealth, or if the department deems a quarantine advisable upon reasonable suspicion of the existence of a pest to test or treat for the pest, the department may establish and enforce quarantines for a pest and related to a premises, plant, pollinator or regulated article infected, exposed or contaminated or suspected of or susceptible to contamination by the pest or capable of carrying, 20250HB1277PN1431 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 harboring or spreading the pest. Failure to follow a quarantine order issued by the department shall subject the violator to penalties specified under this chapter.(c) Special requirements.--(1) In addition to other prohibitions or standards, the department may, through the issuance of a quarantine order, prohibit the planting, growing, holding or harvesting of any crop or the management or distribution, or both, of anything that serves as a host or reservoir for the pest.(2) The quarantine order may include prohibiting the establishment of a specific crop or pollinator colony within a geographic area, including this entire Commonwealth, or during a specified time period.(3) If a crop or pollinator is determined to have the ability to harbor, is suspected of harboring or is harboring a pest, the department may require treatment or destruction of the crop or pollinator.(4) A quarantine order may be amended and expanded to cover any new area found to be infected with a pest and any adjacent areas as the department deems necessary to prevent or limit the movement of the pest.(5) The department shall transmit notice and the effective date of an amendment to a quarantine order under paragraph (4) to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and publish the notice on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(d) Quarantine types.--Quarantines may be one of the following:(1) An interstate quarantine and international 20250HB1277PN1431 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 quarantine.(2) A general quarantine.(3) A special quarantine.(e) Interstate quarantines and international quarantines.--(1) (i) An interstate quarantine or international quarantine, or both, may be established and enforced by order of the department against a place outside this Commonwealth for any of the reasons specified in subsections (a) and (b) or where a pest is reported to exist.(ii) An interstate quarantine order or international quarantine order may prohibit the following from being brought into or entering this Commonwealth, except in accordance with the requirements specified in the quarantine order:(A) a pest; or(B) any item exposed to, contaminated by, suspected of, susceptible to contamination by or capable of carrying, harboring or spreading the pest.(iii) The order may require the quarantine, testing, treatment, sanitizing, sterilizing, disinfecting, confiscation, destruction, eradication or other disposition of anything that is part of or subject to the quarantine order which is brought into this Commonwealth in violation of the quarantine order, including any goods, products, conveyances, materials or associated containers or other regulated articles, or any premises where the regulated articles were transported or kept in this Commonwealth.(iv) The order may also require that a person 20250HB1277PN1431 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violating the quarantine order bear the costs of enforcement and postentry expenses relating to a quarantine order, including testing, cleanup and eradication costs.(2) An interstate quarantine or international quarantine shall be established by order of the department and shall be effective as of the date of actual or constructive notice of the quarantine order or a later date as specified in the quarantine order.(3) An interstate or international quarantine that is established by the United States Department of Agriculture may be adopted and enforced by the department for any of the reasons specified in subsections (a) and (b) or where a pest is reported to exist.(4) The department shall transmit notice of the order to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 20 days of the date of the order and publish the order on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. Publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin shall affect constructive notice. The quarantine order may be enforced prior to the publication or distribution.(5) The department shall, if practicable, mail by conventional or electronic means or deliver notice and a copy of the quarantine order to the governmental agency overseeing agricultural affairs in the state or nation against which the quarantine is directed. The quarantine order may be enforced prior to the publication or distribution.(f) General quarantines.--(1) A general quarantine order may be established and 20250HB1277PN1431 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforced by the department against an area or locality within this Commonwealth for any of the reasons specified in subsections (a) and (b) to prevent a pest from being carried into, within, from or out of the area or locality that is subject to the quarantine. A general quarantine order may pertain to any pest and anything infected, exposed to, contaminated by, suspected of or susceptible to contamination by, or capable of carrying, harboring or spreading the pest into this Commonwealth, or into or from the area subject to a quarantine order. A general quarantine order may encompass any geographic area or locality within this Commonwealth, including this entire Commonwealth.(2) A general quarantine order shall be established by the department and shall be effective as of the date of actual or constructive notice of the general quarantine order or a later date specified in the general quarantine order.(3) The department shall transmit notice of the general quarantine order to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 20 days of the date of the general quarantine order and publish the general quarantine order on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. Publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin shall affect constructive notice. The general quarantine order may be enforced prior to the publication or distribution.(g) Special quarantines.--(1) A special quarantine may be established and enforced by order of the department against a premises, plant, pollinator or other regulated article infected, exposed to, contaminated by or suspected of or susceptible to 20250HB1277PN1431 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contamination by a pest, or capable of carrying, harboring or spreading the pest for any of the reasons specified in subsections (a) and (b) or whenever it is deemed necessary or advisable by the department to:(i) prevent or limit the spread of a pest;(ii) examine, disinfect or regulate a premises, or examine, disinfect or regulate the use or movement of a regulated article infected, exposed or contaminated by or suspected of or susceptible to contamination by a pest or capable of carrying, harboring or spreading the pest; or(iii) destroy or dispose of any pest or other regulated article infected, exposed or contaminated by a pest.(2) A special quarantine shall be established by the posting of a special quarantine order describing the pest or pests involved, describing the premises or area covered and delineating the regulated articles covered by the special quarantine. The department may require the special quarantine order to be conspicuously posted and visitors to the quarantined premise to be alerted of the presence of the pest.(3) If practicable, the department shall serve a copy of the special quarantine order upon the owner, lessee, manager or custodian of the premises subject to the order.(h) Violations of quarantine order.--It is unlawful to:(1) distribute, move, remove or allow to be removed anything in this Commonwealth that is the subject of a quarantine order under this section in a manner that is not defined by the order;(2) allow anything in this Commonwealth that is the 20250HB1277PN1431 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subject of a quarantine order under this section to be transported, conveyed or otherwise moved outside of the quarantined premises, geographic area or locality in a manner that is not defined in the order;(3) distribute anything in this Commonwealth that is the subject of a quarantine order under this section without first notifying the prospective or actual transferee of the quarantine order and the reasons for the imposition of the quarantine order. The transferee shall become subject to all restrictions and provisions of the quarantine order and this chapter;(4) tear, deface, destroy, remove, conceal or alter in any way a notice of quarantine posted by the department, or to remove or destroy, partially or wholly, any portion of a building, tree, fence or other object to which a notice of quarantine has been posted by the department;(5) bring into this Commonwealth a pest or regulated article that is the subject of a quarantine order under this section;(6) impede, hinder or interfere with the department or an inspector for the department entering upon premises or elsewhere in the performance of duties imposed by this chapter; or(7) violate any provision of a quarantine order issued under this chapter.SUBCHAPTER BLICENSURE AND CERTIFICATIONSec.1611. Location licensing.1612. Revocation, denial or suspension of license.20250HB1277PN1431 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1613. Reciprocal agreements.1614. Transportation of plants for planting.1615. International importation of managed pollinators.1616. Interstate transportation of managed pollinators into Commonwealth.1617. Notice of arrival from outside Commonwealth of honey bees for distribution.1618. Importation and intrastate movement of pests.§ 1611. Location licensing.(a) Licensure of locations.--(1) A person that has a beekeeper location, business location or remote location within this Commonwealth and carries out any of the actions of a plant merchant or pollinator operation shall be licensed and shall license each business location or remote location with the department in accordance with this chapter.(2) As part of the license application, the person shall identify any location where honey bees are kept or where plants for planting or managed pollinators are maintained, managed, displayed, warehoused or grown for the purpose of distribution at that location or through a physically separate business location.(b) Licensure of remote locations.--If a plant merchant or pollinator operation does not have a premises, business location or business location within this Commonwealth, but has one or more remote locations within this Commonwealth, the plant merchant or pollinator operation shall license each remote location with the department in accordance with subsection (c) and shall refrain from the operation of any business at the remote location until a license has been issued by the 20250HB1277PN1431 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department as specified in subsection (d).(c) Application for licensure.--(1) A person seeking to license a plant merchant, pollinator operation, premises, business, business location or remote location with the department, as required under this chapter, shall file an application for licensure with the department and pay the appropriate license fee.(2) The license application shall be submitted on either a paper or electronic form supplied by the department.(3) A remote location may be added to an existing license at any time.(4) It shall be a violation of this chapter for a plant merchant, pollinator operation, business location or remote location to operate without a license as required under this chapter.(d) Department actions.--The department shall review each license application for completeness and accuracy. Prior to the issuance of a license, the department may conduct an onsite inspection and sampling at the location or premises of a person seeking a license, including any additional business locations or remote locations where licensure is sought. If the department determines the requirements of this chapter have been met, the department shall issue the applicant a license.(e) Relocation.--A licensee is required to report a permanent change of address of a beekeeper location, business location or remote location. The owner of an out yard which is properly registered as a pollinator operation under this chapter shall not be required to report the temporary relocation of a hive or hives for up to 90 days for crop pollination if proper records of hive locations are maintained by the owner at a 20250HB1277PN1431 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 location available to the department for inspection.(f) License.--A license issued by the department shall be prominently displayed at each business location where sales occur. A license issued by the department to a beekeeper location or remote location shall be retained by the plant merchant or pollinator operation that owns, leases or manages the location and shall be produced for inspection by the department upon request.(g) Licensure period.--(1) A plant merchant license shall be valid for January 1 through December 31 of the calendar year in which the license is issued, unless revoked or suspended by the department before the end of the calendar year.(2) A pollinator operator license shall be valid for the 12-month period July 1 through June 30, unless revoked or suspended by the department before the end of the period.(3) After initial licensing, a business shall maintain active licensure by submitting an application for license renewal to the department, with renewal fees, for as long as the business is engaging in activity requiring a license. A license renewal must cover at least one 12-month licensing cycle, except that the department may offer multiyear renewal options. A renewal application shall be made available by the department at least two months prior to the license expiration date.(4) If a person discontinues licensed activities, the person shall notify the department by filing an application of closure on a form provided by the department.(5) If a person other than the person identified on the license assumes ownership of operation of the licensed 20250HB1277PN1431 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 establishment, the following shall apply:(i) The current licensee shall notify the department of the change of ownership through the use of a renewal form or other method prescribed by the department.(ii) If the current licensee has no other locations or activities requiring a license, the current licensee shall file an application of closure on a form provided by the department.(iii) The new owner or operator shall immediately file an application for licensure as specified in subsection (c) and shall refrain from operating until a license has been issued by the department as specified in subsection (d) and a license has been issued.(iv) The current licensee shall submit to a closing inspection if requested by the department.(h) Grandfathering.--A plant merchant or pollinator operation renewal notice or completed license issued under former Chapter 21 (relating to bees) or the former act of December 16, 1992 (P.L.1228, No.162), known as the Plant Pest Act, shall be considered valid under this chapter until the next renewal cycle provided by this chapter.(i) Labeling.--The department may, by regulation or order, establish labeling requirements for plants for planting, hives or other regulated articles.(j) Records.--(1) A licensed person or person required to be licensed under this chapter shall keep and maintain the following records:(i) Records that identify the date, source, type and quantity of plants, managed pollinators or used hives the 20250HB1277PN1431 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensed person acquires.(ii) Records that identify the date, type and quantity of plants, managed pollinators or used hives the licensed person distributes to others.(2) If the licensed person wholesales or distributes plants or managed pollinators to another licensed business or business required to be licensed, or to a person other than the final end user, the records shall specify the name and address of the business and business license number where available or person to which the plants or managed pollinators were distributed.(3) Records shall be maintained for a minimum of three years, except if ordered by the department.(k) Additional records.--The department may promulgate regulations regarding any records required to be kept under this chapter. The department may include in an order additional requirements regarding records required to be kept under this chapter.(l) Duty to provide access to records.--A licensed person or person required to be licensed under this chapter shall make the records available to the department for review, inspection and copying upon the department's request.(m) Prenotification of shipments.--The department may, by regulation or order, require a licensed person residing within this Commonwealth or doing business outside this Commonwealth who distributes or receives plants for planting or managed pollinators in this Commonwealth to prenotify the department of incoming shipments at least 48 hours prior to shipping. Notification shall be made via electronic means as identified by the department. Failure to comply with this subsection may 20250HB1277PN1431 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 result in a stop order, return of material or destruction of the material by the department at the expense of the person who was the original distributor.(n) Sources of plants and pollinators.--(1) A licensed person that purchases, possesses, acquires, grows, stores, keeps or distributes to others plants for planting or managed pollinators shall only purchase, possess, acquire, store, keep or distribute to others plants or pollinators that have been produced under an official Federal or State licensure program and are compliant with all requirements of this chapter and any regulations or orders of the department.(2) A licensed person may collect plants or pollinators, such as feral bees and swarms, from noncertified sources. The licensed person shall notify the department of the intention to make the collections, via mechanisms provided by the department, so that an inspection may be scheduled when appropriate. Collected material must meet pest tolerances established by the department under this chapter.(o) Prohibition to operate.--It shall be a violation of this chapter for a person required to be licensed under this chapter to operate without a license. A person required to be licensed under this chapter shall be subject to the penalties and remedies established by this chapter or regulations or orders of the department. It shall not be a valid defense to a civil penalty, criminal prosecution, action in equity or other remedy imposed or action at law undertaken by the department under this chapter that the person failed to obtain a license or lacked the knowledge of the need to obtain a license. The department shall have the authority against the person as the department does 20250HB1277PN1431 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 against a person that has lawfully obtained the required license.(p) Pollinator certificate of inspection.--(1) A pollinator certificate of inspection issued by the department must accompany queen honey bees, nucleus colonies, colonies, package bees or other managed pollinators being distributed within this Commonwealth. A licensed person may produce copies of the pollinator certificate of inspection to accompany multiple transactions, but certificates are not transferrable to other persons. A pollinator certificate of inspection shall be valid for one year for intrastate distribution of pollinators.(2) A pollinator certificate of inspection issued by the department shall accompany interstate shipments if required by other states for queen honey bees, nucleus colonies, colonies, package bees or other managed pollinators being transported to that state.(q) Duty to report pests.--It shall be the duty of every licensed person or person required to be licensed under this chapter to report to the department immediately upon finding or being notified of the presence of a pest exceeding established pest tolerances. Failure to report constitutes a violation of this chapter.(r) Right-to-Know Law exemption.--Personally identifiable information, including the names, addresses or phone numbers of a person not required to hold a license under this chapter, but who agrees to host or have placed on their property plants for planting or one or more bee hives associated with a licensed person shall not be accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), 20250HB1277PN1431 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 known as the Right-to-Know Law.§ 1612. Revocation, denial or suspension of license.The department may revoke, suspend or deny a license for sufficient cause, and for a time period determined by the department, which may include multiple licensure periods. Sufficient cause includes the following:(1) A violation of this chapter or a provision, rule, regulation or order adopted under this chapter.(2) A finding by the department that a license issued under this chapter is being used in connection with:(i) a premises known to be infected or infested with a pest;(ii) the possession or distribution of plants, plants for planting, plant products, pollinators, managed pollinators, pollinator products, tools and equipment, apiaries, colonies, hives or other regulated articles that are known to be infested or infected with a pest; or(iii) assisting others in a violation of this chapter or a provision, rule, regulation or order adopted under this chapter.(3) That a licensed person or person required to be licensed under this chapter has knowingly purchased, bought, accepted, received, warehoused or held plants, plants for planting, plant products, pollinators, managed pollinators, pollinator products, tools or equipment, apiaries, colonies, hives or other regulated articles that are known to be infested or infected with a pest or were not shipped under the proper phytosanitary or certification standards.(4) A finding by the department that plants or pollinators were knowingly shipped or transported into this 20250HB1277PN1431 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth in violation of Federal or State quarantine or phytosanitary or other certification standards.(5) A finding by the department that the department is unable to safely or effectively perform an inspection or other action under this chapter due to the physical condition of the licensee's premises or the regulated articles that are subject to the inspection or action.(6) A finding by the department that the applicant or licensee has denied access to or made it impossible for the department to conduct an inspection of a beekeeper location, business location, remote location or other premises subject to this chapter.(7) A finding by the department that the applicant or licensee has failed to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter, after applicable appeal periods have expired or a final judgment has been rendered and the final adjudication issued.(8) A finding by the department that the applicant or licensee has made a material misstatement, misrepresentation or omission in the application for licensure or has made a material misstatement, misrepresentation or omission to the department regarding a matter relevant to compliance with this chapter, a regulation promulgated under this chapter or an order issued under this chapter.§ 1613. Reciprocal agreements.(a) Solicitation authorized.--A person residing or doing business outside this Commonwealth who desires to solicit orders for plants for planting or managed pollinators in this Commonwealth may solicit orders in this Commonwealth if the person is certified, registered or licensed in another state 20250HB1277PN1431 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with laws and regulations that comply with Federal standards and are at least as stringent as those of the Commonwealth, and their name appears on an official state directory of certified, registered or licensed nurseries and nursery dealers, plant merchants, pollinator operations, licensees or registrants. If a business is located in a state where no licensure program is available, the department may work with the state of origin to develop an appropriate procedure to allow safe movement of material into this Commonwealth.(b) Records.--A person doing business in this Commonwealth under this section shall keep records of sales into this Commonwealth and make the records available upon request. Records shall be kept for three years. Failure to keep or provide sales records is a violation of this chapter and regulated articles moved into this Commonwealth by a person who has violated this section is subject to a stop order, rejection and destruction at the expense of the person.§ 1614. Transportation of plants for planting.(a) General documentation.--Plants for planting intended for distribution and transported into, within or through this Commonwealth shall be accompanied by the following:(1) A copy of the license under which the plants are being transported. The following apply:(i) For intrastate movement, a copy of the license for the plant merchant distributing the plants.(ii) For transport from out-of-State, a plant merchant license or other valid document issued by the proper official of the state, territory, district or country from which the plants were shipped, sent or brought showing that the plants for planting are in 20250HB1277PN1431 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compliance with the plant pest certification requirements and standards of the state or nation from which the plants originated and from which the plants were shipped or transported.(2) The names and addresses of the consignor and consignee and the scientific name and quantity of each plant.(b) Associated documentation.--If documentation required under subsection (a) is not the same for each plant in a shipment, documentation shall be provided in a manner sufficient to clearly associate plants with the correct documentation. Documents may be transported with or attached to the full conveyance or carload, truckload, bale, box, container, package or plant.(c) Valid license required.--Plants for planting brought into this Commonwealth with the documentation required under this subsection may be distributed, offered for distribution or moved only under a valid license issued under this chapter.(d) Additional documentation.--The department may, by regulation or order, amend or add documentation requirements for plants for planting being shipped or transported.(e) Improperly transported plants.--If plants for planting are transported into this Commonwealth in violation of this chapter, including transporting plants for planting without valid documentation issued by the proper out-of-State authority or transporting plants for planting suspected of harboring pests, and the person receiving the plants for planting notifies the department within five business days, the department may direct the plants be returned to the consignor or shipper, held for inspection or any other action authorized under this chapter.20250HB1277PN1431 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Violation.--It shall be a violation of this chapter to deliver, transport or ship into or within this Commonwealth plants for planting or other regulated articles which are not in compliance with this chapter.§ 1615. International importation of managed pollinators.(a) Pollinator certificate of inspection.--(1) Except where otherwise preempted by Federal law, the department shall require that every person intending to import, ship, bring or transport living managed pollinators or viable reproductive forms of managed pollinators into or through this Commonwealth from outside the United States for any purpose receive advanced written permission from the department.(2) The person requesting permission shall provide advanced notification to the department through the filing of a pollinator certificate of inspection or other form provided by the department. Movement of a managed pollinator into or through this Commonwealth may not occur until the department has provided written approval. If a Federal importation process exists, the department may request that the importer provide to the department copies of records to verify compliance with the Federal process.(b) Certification requirements.--The certificate of inspection shall certify that:(1) A physical inspection of the managed pollinators was made within 30 days preceding the date of shipment.(2) At least 10% of the managed pollinators in the shipment were inspected and that they are free of known pests.(3) The managed pollinators are the species described in 20250HB1277PN1431 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the shipping documents and meet the requirements of this chapter.(c) Receipt of shipment.--Each licensed person or licensed establishment shall be responsible for assuring that an international shipment of managed pollinators received are accompanied by a properly executed pollinator certificate of inspection and otherwise meet the standards and requirements of this chapter.(d) Shipment in violation of chapter.--If a shipment is not accompanied by the required pollinator certificate of inspection specified in this section or does not otherwise comply with the standards and requirements of this chapter, the licensed person or licensed establishment shall notify the department within 72 hours of receipt of the shipment and hold the shipment in an area away from other managed pollinators, subject to an order issued by the department under this chapter, including quarantine, stop order, treatment order and destruction.§ 1616. Interstate transportation of managed pollinators into Commonwealth.(a) Certificate of inspection.--A person shall not transport honey bees into this Commonwealth without a certificate of inspection signed by the chief apiary inspector or corresponding inspection official of the state or county from which the honey bees are being transported. The department may require a certificate of inspection for other managed pollinators being shipped into this Commonwealth.(b) Third-party certification.--The department may accept a certificate from a third-party certifier if a state has no formal program and the department has preapproved the third party.20250HB1277PN1431 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Certification requirements.--The certificate of inspection shall certify that:(1) A physical inspection of the managed pollinators was made within 30 days preceding the date of shipment.(2) At least 10% of the managed pollinators and other regulated articles in the shipment were inspected and that they meet pest tolerances established by the department.(3) The managed pollinators are the species described in the shipping documents and meet the requirements of this chapter.(d) Additional documentation.--Documentation describing the type and quantity of regulated articles in the shipment and the name and address of the owner of the regulated articles shall accompany each shipment.(e) Receipt of shipment.--A licensed person or licensed establishment shall be responsible for assuring shipments of managed pollinators and other regulated articles the licensed person or licensed establishment receives are accompanied by a properly executed certificate of inspection and otherwise meet the standards and requirements of this chapter.(f) Shipment in violation of chapter.--If a shipment is not accompanied by the required certificate of inspection specified in this section or does not otherwise comply with the standards and requirements of this chapter, the licensed person or licensed establishment shall notify the department within 72 hours of receipt of the shipment and hold the shipment in an area away from other managed pollinators, subject to an order issued by the department under this chapter, including quarantine, stop order, treatment order and destruction.§ 1617. Notice of arrival from outside Commonwealth of honey 20250HB1277PN1431 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bees for distribution.(a) Notice.--Notice of the arrival from outside this Commonwealth of honey bees intended for further distribution shall be given by the licensed person first receiving the shipment in the Commonwealth to the department's Bureau of Plant Industry, Apiary Inspection Program, via electronic or hard copy as identified by the department. Notice shall be made prior to or within 10 days after the arrival within this Commonwealth of honey bee colonies, queens and package bees that are distributed. The notice shall contain the following information:(1) The name and contact information of the licensed person receiving the shipment.(2) The total number of regulated articles contained in the shipment.(3) The state or territory of origin of the regulated articles in the shipment.(b) No notice with further distribution.--Notice to the department shall not be required for additional distribution points.(c) Records.--The licensed person providing notice shall retain the following records for three years after receipt of the shipment and make the records available to the department upon request:(1) A copy of the pollinator certificate of inspection required by section 1616 (relating to interstate transportation of managed pollinators into Commonwealth).(2) Information describing the distribution of the regulated articles, including the name and contact information of all persons receiving the regulated articles, and quantities received by each person.20250HB1277PN1431 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1618. Importation and intrastate movement of pests.The department may administer a permitting process allowing lawful movement of pests into or within this Commonwealth. The permitting may be in association with a Federal permitting system or the permitting may be independent if the secretary determines a threat to this Commonwealth is not addressed through the Federal permitting system. It shall be a violation of this chapter for a person to transport a pest into or within this Commonwealth for research or any other purpose without first receiving the department's written approval to transport the pest.SUBCHAPTER CENFORCEMENTSec.1619. Enforcement.1620. Violations.1621. Interference with inspector.1622. Criminal penalties.1623. Civil penalties.1624. Injunctive relief.§ 1619. Enforcement.The department may employ proper means for enforcement of this chapter, including issuing notices and orders, filing violations for criminal prosecution, imposing civil penalties, seeking injunctive relief and entering into agreements, such as consent agreements, cooperative agreements and compliance agreements, necessary to enforce and carry out the provisions of this chapter.§ 1620. Violations.(a) Noncompliance.--A person may not violate or fail to 20250HB1277PN1431 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 comply with any provision of this chapter or regulations, rules, orders or agreements established or entered into under the provisions of this chapter, or to assist in any violation of this chapter.(b) Infected plants for planting, managed pollinators, hives or equipment.--A licensed person or licensed establishment may not knowingly:(1) keep or maintain without proper treatment any plants, managed pollinators, hives or equipment exposed to, infected with or affected by pests; or(2) position the plants, managed pollinators, hives or equipment in a manner that would allow unexposed or uninfected plants or pollinators to have access to the plants, managed pollinators, hives or equipment.(c) Infected plants for planting or managed pollinators.--A licensed person or licensed establishment shall not distribute or transport any plants for planting, honey bees or other managed pollinators affected with a pest at a level exceeding established pest tolerance levels.(d) Hives.--(1) A licensed person or licensed establishment may not keep or maintain honey bees in any hive other than that which permits a thorough examination of every comb to determine the presence of pests. Other types of hives or receptacles for honey bees which are in use are declared to be a public nuisance and a menace to the community, and the department or an inspector for the department may seize and destroy the hive or receptacle without remuneration to the owner.(2) The department may approve other types of hives or receptacles being used for educational or research purposes.20250HB1277PN1431 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) False declarations and deception.--It shall be a violation of this chapter for a licensed person to do any of the following:(1) Conceal or cause the concealment, hide or take measures to evade inspection of managed pollinators, plants for planting or other regulated articles.(2) Willfully make a false declaration of acreage, square footage or numbers of plants, managed colonies, premises or any other regulated article or fail to provide any other information requested and necessary for implementation, administration and enforcement of this chapter.(3) Incorrectly label or falsify documentation of managed pollinators, plants for planting or other regulated articles intended for distribution, in order to circumvent a rule, regulation, order or agreement made under this chapter.(f) Destructive conduct.--(1) It is a violation of this chapter for a person in this Commonwealth to participate in or conduct a deliberate act that exposes free-flying honey bees or pollinators to a known source of a regulated pest, or to a substance commonly known to kill honey bees and other pollinators. The deliberate acts that are prohibited include the following:(i) Placing in a location that is accessible to free-flying honey bees or pollinators any beeswax combs, beekeeping equipment, honey or other substance known to be attractive to pollinators, capable of transmitting pests and known to have been in contact with or associated with sources of regulated pest.(ii) Placing in a location that is accessible to 20250HB1277PN1431 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 free-flying honey bees or pollinators any honey, sugar syrup, corn syrup or other substance known to be attractive to pollinators and to which some pesticide or other substance harmful to pollinators has been added.(2) This section shall not apply to a person who is using legally registered pesticides in strict compliance with the label instructions.(3) This section shall not negate any part of 18 Pa.C.S. § 5549 (relating to a ssault with a biological agent on animal, fowl or honey bees) . § 1621. Interference with inspector.A person who willfully or intentionally interferes with an employee, inspector or agent of the department in the performance of duties or activities authorized under this chapter commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $2,500 or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.§ 1622. Criminal penalties.A person that violates the provisions of this chapter, including a rule, regulation, order or agreement adopted under this chapter, may be subject to the following:(1) For a first offense, a person commits a summary offense and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500 for each offense or to imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both.(2) For a subsequent offense committed within three years of a prior conviction for a violation of this chapter or a provision, rule, regulation or order adopted under this chapter, a person commits a misdemeanor of the second degree 20250HB1277PN1431 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000 or to imprisonment for not more than two years, or both, at the discretion of the court.§ 1623. Civil penalties.(a) Authority to assess.--(1) Subject to subsection (b), in addition to proceeding under any other remedy available at law or in equity for a violation of this chapter or a provision, rule, regulation or order adopted under this chapter, the department may assess a civil penalty not to exceed $20,000, plus cost of remediation, containment or eradication, upon a person for each violation of this chapter or a provision, rule, regulation or order adopted under this chapter.(2) The civil penalty assessed shall be payable to the department for deposit into the Plant and Pollinator Protection Account.(3) The penalty amount shall be collectible in any manner provided by law for the collection of debt, including referring any collection matter to the Office of Attorney General, which shall recover the amount by action in the appropriate court.(b) Hearing.--A civil penalty shall not be assessed unless the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing on assessment in accordance with the provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).§ 1624. Injunctive relief.In addition to any other remedies provided for in this 20250HB1277PN1431 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chapter, the Office of Attorney General, at the request of the secretary, may initiate, in Commonwealth Court or the court of common pleas of the county in which the defendant resides or has a place of business, an action in equity for an injunction to restrain a violation of this chapter or a provision, rule, regulation or order adopted under this chapter from which no timely appeal has been taken or which has been sustained on appeal. In the proceeding, the court shall, upon motion of the Commonwealth, issue a preliminary injunction if the court finds that the defendant is engaging in unlawful conduct under this chapter. The Commonwealth shall not be required to furnish bond or other security in connection with the proceedings. In addition to an injunction, the court, in equity proceedings, may levy civil penalties as provided for in section 1623 (relating to civil penalties).SUBCHAPTER DMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.1625. Cooperation with other entities.1626. Voluntary certification programs.1627. Authority to establish marketing programs.1628. Establishment of advisory boards and committees.1629. Fees.1630. Disposition of funds.1631. Exclusion of local laws and regulations.§ 1625. Cooperation with other entities.The department may cooperate with and enter into agreements with the Federal Government, governmental agencies of the Commonwealth and any other state in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter. The department may 20250HB1277PN1431 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cooperate with and receive grants-in-aid, gifts and donations and may enter into agreements with any person for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this chapter.§ 1626. Voluntary certification programs.(a) Voluntary certification programs.--(1) The department may establish and implement voluntary certification programs that would add value to Commonwealth commodities while blocking movement of invasive species that are detrimental to this Commonwealth's plants or pollinators. The voluntary certification programs may be utilized for a commodity whose movement may act as a pathway for movement of one or more invasive species.(2) The department shall establish the standards and processes for a voluntary certification program and shall transmit notice of the standards and processes for the program to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The Pennsylvania Bulletin notice shall include, at a minimum:(i) The name of the voluntary certification program and general description, including a designated program contact.(ii) A description of the commodity addressed by the voluntary certification program.(iii) A description of the invasive species, listed by both common and scientific name, addressed by the voluntary certification program.(iv) Standards, such as commodity production provisions, inspection requirements and recordkeeping and audit requirements, that must be met in order to certify that a particular commodity is apparently free from one 20250HB1277PN1431 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or more invasive species or meets the pest tolerance levels established for invasive species.(v) The certification program time lines and deadlines.(vi) The information required on an application for certification under the program which, at a minimum, shall include the following:(A) Business name, contact name, address, telephone and email address.(B) Physical location of business and commodity.(C) Type and quantities of commodity expected to be eligible for certification.(D) Proof of current licensure required for the production of the commodity.(E) An attestation of compliant status, indicating no violations, criminal or civil actions or outstanding penalties relating to this chapter.(F) Third-party inspection certification standards, where applicable.(G) Fees associated with the particular voluntary certification program.(b) Voluntary systems approach programs.--(1) The department shall develop and implement programs incorporating a voluntary systems approach to enhance the Commonwealth's plant merchant and pollinator operation licensure programs, including surveillance and enforcement of this chapter or regulations, rules, orders or agreements established or entered into under this chapter. The department may, under the program, establish standards and certify that specific identified managed pollinators or 20250HB1277PN1431 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 plants for planting:(i) were produced and maintained in accordance with best management practices, including specific surveillance and testing standards;(ii) meet the voluntary systems approach program standards and any Federal or State quarantine requirements; and(iii) are eligible for distribution with requirements different from those of regulated material not under the systems approach program.(2) Voluntary systems approach programs shall employ a systems approach to reach or maintain a pest tolerance standard. The department shall establish voluntary systems approach programs through an agreement with participants wishing to participate in the voluntary program and shall transmit notice of the program to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(3) A person wishing to participate in a voluntary systems approach program must sign an agreement with the department relating to that particular program. The agreement shall incorporate the best management practices and standards established for that program in the notice, further define the duties and obligations of the program participant and make provisions of the program mandatory and enforceable against the participant. The department may, by agreement, establish and charge fees for program participation and certifications.(c) Voluntary certification.--A voluntary certification issued by the department under this section shall not constitute 20250HB1277PN1431 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a guarantee of quality or a guarantee that the specific commodity identified in the certification is free of pests or invasive species.(d) Failure to comply.--Failure to comply with the standards of a voluntary certification program created under this section may, at the department's discretion, result in the participant's removal from the certification program. If the participant is removed from the certification program, the participant shall immediately cease and desist from labeling, claims, promotions and advertising associated with the voluntary certification program. A licensee that has been removed from a voluntary certification program may seek reinstatement after one year from the date of removal.(e) No effect on other legal standards.--Enrollment in and compliance with the provisions of a voluntary certification program adopted under this section are in addition to and do not abrogate, nullify or replace any other standards or requirements of this chapter or other statutes or regulations administered by the department.§ 1627. Authority to establish marketing programs.As resources allow, the department may offer promotional or incentive programs to provide outreach on licensing requirements under this chapter or to encourage support of plant or pollinator best management practices, such as enhancing or expanding pollinator habitats.§ 1628. Establishment of advisory boards and committees.(a) Plant and Pollinator Protection Committee.--The Plant and Pollinator Protection Committee is established as an advisory board in the department. The following apply:(1) The purpose of the committee shall be to advise the 20250HB1277PN1431 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department on problems relating to the health of plants and pollinators and of the related industries regulated under this chapter, including recommendations on:(i) pest tolerance levels defined in section 1605 (relating to regulations, orders and pest tolerances);(ii) the risk basis of inspection programs; and(iii) needed legislation, regulations and agency programs and policies.(2) The committee shall be composed of a minimum of seven members:(i) One plant protection division chief or designee from the department.(ii) Two representatives of the managed pollinator industry, at least one of which is selected by the Pennsylvania State Beekeepers Association.(iii) Two representatives of the plant merchant industry.(iv) One representative of pollinator education or research.(v) One representative of plant pest education or research.(3) Committee members shall be appointed by the secretary for terms of four years and may be appointed for successive four-year terms at the discretion of the secretary. The secretary may remove a member of the committee prior to the expiration of term of appointment for cause.(4) Upon the death, resignation or removal for cause of a member of the committee, the secretary shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term.(5) The committee may recommend to the secretary that 20250HB1277PN1431 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 additional committee members be appointed as needed for plant and pollinator protection, and that there are identified issues which require additional perspectives or subject matter expertise.(6) The department representative shall serve as chair. The members of the committee shall meet at the time and place as specified by the call of the secretary, chair or a majority of the board, but no less than once per calendar year.(b) Additional advisory boards and committees.--The secretary may establish additional advisory boards and committees as necessary to address plant and pollinator health issues. The following apply:(1) The secretary or the secretary's designee shall serve as chair.(2) Members may include other State agencies, educational institutions, industry representatives, researchers and conservationists.(3) Members shall be appointed by the secretary.(4) The secretary may request a group to be formed for specific areas of concern for plant and pollinator pests and pest management issues.(5) The secretary may dissolve an advisory board or committee once the secretary determines that the plant or pollinator health issue has been resolved or the services of the board or committee are no longer needed.§ 1629. Fees.(a) Fees relating to plant merchant activity.--(1) The following annual fees shall apply, unless modified by the department in accordance with this section. 20250HB1277PN1431 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Fees for plant merchants shall be due by January 1 of each calendar year. A late fee of $50 shall be imposed for any fee not received by February 1 of each calendar year. Each business location of the plant merchant shall be licensed and subject to the fees established in this section. Each licensed establishment shall pay one fee at the highest annual license fee determined by the size of the business location from out of the following:(i) Less than 1,000 square feet indoors and less than 10 acres outdoors, $100.(ii) 1,000 to 5,000 square feet indoors and 10 to 100 acres outdoors, $200.(iii) More than 5,000 square feet indoors and more than 100 acres outdoors, $300.(2) The following fees shall be due upon receipt of invoice for specialized phytosanitary certification inspection or services delivered. Businesses are required to contact and schedule phytosanitary certification inspections at least one week in advance. Additional fees, as specified in subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii), (iv) and (v), shall be added for inspections requested with less than one week's notice:(i) Business, $50 per certificate.(ii) Nonbusiness, $25 per certificate.(iii) Federal phytosanitary inspection, equal to Federal fee.(iv) Late notice fee, $100 plus any overtime incurred if less than one week's notice is provided.(v) Compliance agreements for interstate shipment, $200 each, paid annually, which may include multiple 20250HB1277PN1431 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 states in a single agreement.(b) Fees relating to pollinator operation activity.--(1) Registration fees for a new pollinator operation license shall be submitted prior to or within 30 days of receiving honey bees. Renewal fees for pollinator operations shall be due by June 30 of the calendar year of the application. A late fee of $20 shall be imposed for any renewal fee not received by August 1 of the calendar year. Each business location of a business shall be licensed and subject to the fees established in this section. Each beekeeper location and each licensed establishment shall pay one fee at the highest annual license fee, determined by the size of the beekeeper location and business location, from out of the following:(i) 1 to 20 honey bee colonies, $30.(ii) 21 to 50 honey bee colonies, $60.(iii) 51 or more honey bee colonies, $120.(iv) Pollinator operations that do not keep honey bees, $30.(2) The following fees shall be due upon receipt of invoice for specialized pollinator certification inspection or services delivered:(i) Pollinator certificate of inspection, per service visit, $75.(ii) Discretionary compliance agreements, $200.(iii) Fees for specialized pollinator certification services shall not apply to pollinator operations.(c) Laboratory fees.--The department shall set and charge fees for plant and pollinator pest diagnostic testing or taxonomic identification services.20250HB1277PN1431 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Fees for voluntary certification programs.--In addition to the fees established under this section, the department may establish fees for discretionary inspections, certifications and testing described in section 1626 (relating to voluntary certification programs). Fees for voluntary certification programs shall be established by the department, which shall transmit notice of the fees to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(e) Fee implementation and modification.--The department may, by regulation, fix, adjust and assess fees for licensure, certification, inspection, reinspection and other duties performed under this chapter. The fees shall be set at a level to meet the reasonable expenses incurred by the department in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.(f) Fees previously established.--Fees established under former Chapter 21 (relating to bees) and the former act of December 16, 1992 (P.L.1228, No.162), known as the Plant Pest Act, shall remain in effect until the effective date of this subsection.§ 1630. Disposition of funds.(a) Plant and Pollinator Protection Account.--The Plant and Pollinator Protection Account is established as a restricted account in the General Fund.(b) Plant Pest Management Account.--Money within the Plant Pest Management Account shall be transferred to the Plant and Pollinator Protection Account within 60 days of the effective date of this subsection, at which time the Plant Pest Management Account shall be dissolved.(c) Disposition of money.--Money collected under this 20250HB1277PN1431 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chapter, including money derived from grants, gifts and donations, including money derived from fees, fines and civil penalties, shall be paid into the Plant and Pollinator Protection Account for use by the department in administering this chapter. Money placed in the account under this section shall be made available on the effective date of this subsection and is specifically appropriated to the department for the purpose of improving and enhancing the administration of the programs and duties specified in this chapter. Money placed in the account shall not replace general revenues appropriated for this purpose.(d) Supplements to fund.--The Plant and Pollinator Protection Account may be supplemented by money received from other sources, including:(1) Federal funds appropriated or granted to the department for use consistent with this chapter.(2) State funds appropriated or granted to the department for use consistent with this chapter.(3) Proceeds from the sale of bonds made available to the department for use consistent with this chapter.(4) Gifts, grants, donations and other contributions from public and private sources.§ 1631. Exclusion of local laws and regulations.(a) Preemption.--This chapter and its provisions are of Statewide concern and occupy the whole field of regulation regarding the licensure and inspection of plant merchants and pollinator operations to the exclusion of all local regulations. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, no ordinance or regulation of any political subdivision or home rule municipality may prohibit or in any way attempt to regulate 20250HB1277PN1431 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any matter relating to plant merchants or pollinator operations, if any of these ordinances, laws or regulations are in conflict with this chapter.(b) Local restrictions on beekeeping.--A local agency, political subdivision or home rule municipality may not adopt an ordinance or regulation to restrict or prohibit the keeping of honey bees or other managed pollinators, without notifying the department in writing of their intent to adopt a regulation. A department apiary program representative or designee may be given an opportunity to provide comment at a public meeting prior to a vote on the ordinance or regulation.Section 2. Chapter 21 of Title 3 is repealed:[CHAPTER 21BEESSec.2101. Short title of chapter.2102. Definitions.2103. Chief apiary inspector.2104. Quarantines.2105. Registration of apiaries.2106. Inspection.2107. Diseases.2108. Infected shipments.2109. Prohibitions.2110. Free access.2111. Transportation.2112. Imported bees.2113. Penalties.2114. Civil penalties.2115. Injunctions.20250HB1277PN1431 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 2116. Concurrent remedies.2117. Disposition of funds.§ 2101. Short title of chapter.This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Bee Law.§ 2102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Apiary." Any place where one or more colonies or nuclei of bees are kept."Apiary yard." A fixed location or locations in this Commonwealth where an apiary is maintained on a continuing basis from which hives may be moved to temporary locations for crop pollination and returned."Appliance." Any apparatus, tool, machine or other device used in the handling and manipulating of bees, honey, wax and hives and any container of honey and wax which may be used in any apiary or in transporting bees and their products and apiary supplies."Bee." Any stage of the common hive or honeybee (Apis mellifera) or other species of the genus Apis."Bee disease." Any American or European foul brood, sac brood, bee paralysis or other disease or abnormal condition of eggs, larval, pupal or adult stages of the honeybee."Bureau." The Bureau of Plant Industry of the Department of Agriculture."Hive." Any frame hive, box hive, box, barrel, log, gum, skep or other receptacle or container, natural or artificial, or any part thereof, which may be used or employed as a domicile for bees.20250HB1277PN1431 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Owner of an apiary." Includes all colonies owned by an individual and located in any permanent location or locations within this Commonwealth."Queen apiary." Any apiary or premises in which queen bees are reared or kept for sale or gift."Violation." A violation of this chapter or any order or regulation promulgated under this chapter.§ 2103. Chief apiary inspector.The secretary shall appoint a chief apiary inspector to be in charge of all apiary inspections and shall appoint such additional apiary inspectors as may be necessary. The inspectors shall be attached to the bureau and shall be furnished with official badges or other insignia of authority. The secretary and the bureau are charged with the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.§ 2104. Quarantines.The department may establish, modify and maintain such quarantines as may be necessary to control the shipment into or within this Commonwealth of any bees, queen bees, hives or appliances capable of transmitting any bee disease for such periods and under such conditions as may be necessary in order to control and eradicate any bee disease or to prevent its introduction, spread or dissemination in this Commonwealth and for such purposes may make and promulgate such rules, regulations and orders relating thereto and to the general enforcement of the provisions of this chapter as may be necessary.§ 2105. Registration of apiaries.(a) General rule.--The owner of an apiary located in this Commonwealth shall register the apiary with the department.20250HB1277PN1431 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Application.--The application for registration of an apiary shall be made on a form provided by the department and shall include all of the following:(1) The name and complete mailing address of the owner of the apiary and the name and complete mailing address of the person primarily responsible for maintaining and caring for the apiary if different from the owner.(2) The exact location or locations of each apiary.(3) The number of colonies contained in the apiary.(4) Such other information as the department may require.(c) Fee.--The apiary registration fee shall be $10 for each applicant. No fee shall be charged for temporary relocation of a hive or hives for crop pollination from an apiary yard properly registered as an apiary under this chapter.(d) Registration term.--A registration under this section shall be valid for a period of not more than two calendar years and shall expire on December 31 of the year following the initial year of registration.(e) Relocation.--The department may by regulation require apiary owners to report the relocation of an apiary from its original location as reported at the time of registration to another location in this Commonwealth. The owner of an apiary yard which is properly registered as an apiary under this chapter shall not be required to report the temporary relocation of a hive or hives for crop pollination as long as proper records of hive locations are maintained by the owner at a location available to the department for inspection.§ 2106. Inspection.The department through the inspectors shall at least twice 20250HB1277PN1431 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 during each summer season inspect all queen apiaries. If from the inspection it appears that any bee disease exists in the queen apiary, the apiary inspector making the inspection shall immediately notify in writing the owner or person in charge thereof, and thereafter it shall be unlawful for that person to ship, sell or give away any queen bees from the apiary until the disease has been destroyed and a certificate of that fact has been obtained from the chief inspector. If upon inspection it is found that no bee disease exists in the queen apiary, the chief inspector shall issue a certificate of that fact, and a copy of the certificate shall be attached to each package or shipment of queen bees transported from the apiary. The certificate shall be valid for one year from the date of its issue unless revoked for cause.§ 2107. Diseases.(a) General rule.--The department through the inspectors shall, as far as practicable, inspect all apiaries in this Commonwealth. If upon inspection it is found that any bee disease exists in the apiary, the inspector making the inspection shall immediately notify in writing the owner or person in charge of the apiary, stating the nature of the disease and whether the disease may or may not be successfully treated. If the disease may be successfully treated, the inspector shall specify and direct the necessary treatment, which shall be administered by the owner or person in charge within 14 days.(b) Service of notices.--The written notice required by section 2106 (relating to inspection) and this section may be served by handing a copy thereof to the owner or person in charge of the apiary or by leaving a copy thereof with an adult 20250HB1277PN1431 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person residing upon the premises or by registered mail addressed to the owner or person in charge of the apiary at his last known or reputed address.§ 2108. Infected shipments.Infected shipments, apiaries where the existing disease cannot be successfully treated and apiaries which are affected by disease amenable to treatment but which have not been treated within a period of 14 days after the owner thereof has received notice of the necessary treatment are hereby declared to be a public nuisance and a menace to the community, and the director of the bureau or his authorized agent may destroy by burning or otherwise, without any remuneration to the owner, any infected bees, hives, honey or appliances found therein.§ 2109. Prohibitions.(a) Infected colonies, hives or appliances.--No person shall knowingly keep in his possession without proper treatment any colony of bees affected with any bee disease or expose any diseased colony or infected hive or appliance so that flying bees may have access to them.(b) Infected bees.--No person shall sell, barter or give away, accept, receive or transport any bees affected with any bee disease.(c) Hives.--No person shall keep or maintain honeybees in any hive other than a modern movable frame hive which permits thorough examination of every comb to determine the presence of bee disease. All other types of hives or receptacles for bees which are in use are hereby declared to be a public nuisance and a menace to the community, and the secretary, the chief apiary inspector or any apiary inspector may seize and destroy the hive or receptacle without remuneration to the owner.20250HB1277PN1431 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 2110. Free access.The department, the chief apiary inspector and any apiary inspector shall have free access, ingress and egress to and from any apiary, premises, building or other place, public or private, in which bees, queen bees, wax, honey, hives or appliances may be kept or stored. No person shall deny to such duly authorized officer or agent access to any such place or hinder or resist the inspection of the premises.§ 2111. Transportation.No person shall transport bees, hives or appliances into this Commonwealth unless they are accompanied with a certificate of inspection signed by the chief apiary inspector or corresponding inspection official of the state or county from which the bees are being transported. The certificate shall certify that actual inspection of the bees was made within 30 days preceding the date of shipment and that the bees, hives and appliances contained in the shipment are free from bee diseases. It is the duty of any officer, agent, servant or employee of any person, firm or corporation engaged in transportation, who shall receive a shipment of bees consigned to a point in this Commonwealth and not having attached thereto a certificate as required, to immediately notify the department and to hold the shipment subject to its orders for a period of 15 days.§ 2112. Imported bees.No person shall import any living insects belonging to the genus Apis from any foreign country except Canada for any purpose without written permission from the department.§ 2113. Penalties.(a) First violation.--A first violation of this chapter or any order or regulation promulgated under this chapter 20250HB1277PN1431 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 constitutes a summary offense punishable by a fine of not less than $100.(b) Second violation.--A second violation of this chapter or any order or regulation promulgated under this chapter constitutes a summary offense punishable by a fine of not less than $300.(c) Subsequent violations.--A third and subsequent violation of this chapter or any order or regulation promulgated under this chapter constitutes a misdemeanor of the third degree punishable by a fine of not less than $1,000.§ 2114. Civil penalties.(a) Assessment.--The department may assess a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 upon a person for each violation.(b) Contest.--If a civil penalty is assessed against a person under subsection (a), the department shall notify the person by certified mail of the nature of the violation and the amount of the civil penalty and that the person may notify the department in writing within ten calendar days that he wishes to contest the civil penalty. If within ten calendar days from the receipt of that notification the person does not notify the department of his intent to contest the assessed penalty, the civil penalty shall become final.(c) Hearing and appeal.--If timely notification of the intent to contest the civil penalty is given, the person contesting the civil penalty shall be provided with a hearing in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies). Appeals may be taken in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).§ 2115. Injunctions.20250HB1277PN1431 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Attorney General at the request of the department may initiate in the Commonwealth Court or the court of common pleas of the county in which the defendant resides or has a place of business an action in equity for an injunction to restrain any violation of this chapter or any order or regulation promulgated under this chapter. The Commonwealth shall not be required to furnish a bond or other security in connection with this proceeding.§ 2116. Concurrent remedies.The penalties and remedies prescribed by this chapter are concurrent. The existence or exercise of any remedy shall not prevent the exercise of any other remedy under this chapter.§ 2117. Disposition of funds.Moneys received from registration fees, fines and civil penalties shall be paid into the State Treasury and shall be credited to the general government operations appropriation of the Department of Agriculture for administering the provisions of this chapter.]Section 3. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of 3 Pa.C.S. Ch. 16.(2) The act of December 16, 1992 (P.L.1228, No.162), known as the Plant Pest Act, is repealed.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1277PN1431 - 72 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425